West Virginia, session 2025, SB480.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. school personnel. §18A-2-3a. Permitting substitute and full-time teachers to serve as parent volunteers without an additional background check. (a) Legislative findings. – The Legislature finds that in some counties in West Virginia, there is a shortage of parent volunteers for school related activities, such as extracurricular events, sporting events, and more. Substitute teachers in this state who have already been through a background check should not have to incur the cost and time of an additional background check to serve as a parent volunteer. Eliminating this requirement would enable more qualified individuals to serve as parent volunteers. (b) Implementation. – Licensed substitute and full-time teachers who have undergone a background check may serve as parent volunteers without obtaining an additional background check.